Idaho, session 2026, H0693.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 92, Title 18, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 92
CONCEALING, HARBORING, AND SHIELDING ALIENS
18-9201. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Alien" means any person not a citizen or national of the United
States.
(2) "Organization" is as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(28), the immigra-
tion and nationality act, including but not limited to an organization, cor-
poration, company, partnership, association, trust, foundation, fund, or
any director, officer, or agent thereof while serving in their official ca-
pacity, and includes a sole proprietorship or group of persons, whether or
not incorporated, permanently or temporarily associated together for joint
action on any subject or subjects.
18-9202. PROHIBITIONS. It shall be unlawful for an organization, or
any director, officer, or agent thereof, in this state to do any of the fol-
lowing:
(1) Conceal, harbor, or shield from detection, attempt to conceal, har-
bor, or shield from detection, or conspire to conceal, harbor, or shield from
detection an illegal alien in any place in this state, including any build-
ing or any means of transportation, if the organization, or any director,
officer, or agent thereof, knows or recklessly disregards the fact that the
alien has come to, has entered, or remains in the United States in viola-
tion of federal law, including being an inadmissible alien. The provisions
of this subsection shall be interpreted as being consistent with 8 U.S.C.
1324(a)(1)(A);
(2) Encourage, promote, coerce, or induce an alien to come to, enter,
or reside in this state if the organization, or any director, officer, or
agent thereof, knows or recklessly disregards the fact that such alien's
coming to, entering, or residing in the United States is or will be in viola-
tion of federal law, including being an inadmissible alien. The provisions


of this subsection shall be interpreted as being consistent with 8 U.S.C.
1324(a)(1)(A);
(3) Transport, attempt to transport, or conspire to transport in
this state an alien in furtherance of the unlawful presence of the alien in
the United States if the organization, or any director, officer, or agent
thereof, knows or recklessly disregards the fact that the alien has come to,
entered, or remained in the United States in violation of federal law, in-
cluding being an inadmissible alien. Conspiracy to be so transported shall
be a violation of this subsection. The provisions of this subsection shall
be interpreted as being consistent with 8 U.S.C. 1324(a)(1)(A); or
(4) Provide, promote, or advertise shelter, financial support, or le-
gal assistance to an alien in this state if the organization, or any direc-
tor, officer, or agent thereof, knows or recklessly disregards the fact that
such alien's coming to, entering, or residing in the United States is or will
be in violation of federal law, including being an inadmissible alien.
18-9203. PENALTIES. (1) Any organization, or any director, officer,
or agent thereof, violating the provisions of section 18-9202, Idaho Code,
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for each unlawfully present alien whose il-
legal presence in the United States and this state the organization, or any
director, officer, or agent thereof, is facilitating or is attempting to fa-
cilitate.
(2) Any organization, or any director, officer, or agent thereof, vi-
olating the provisions of section 18-9202, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of
a felony when the violation involves five (5) or more aliens whose illegal
presence in the United States and this state the organization, or any direc-
tor, officer, or agent thereof, is facilitating or is attempting to facili-
tate.
(3) Any organization, or any director, officer, or agent thereof, with
a prior conviction under section 18-9202, Idaho Code, who commits a subse-
quent violation shall be guilty of a felony.
(4)(a) Upon a finding of a first violation by a court of competent ju-
risdiction that an organization, or any director, officer, or agent
thereof, violated section 18-9202, Idaho Code, the court shall:
(i) Direct the applicable state, county, or municipal governing
body to revoke all business licenses and permits, if such exist,
held by the organization throughout the state for a duration of
one (1) year. Upon receipt of the order, and notwithstanding any
other law, the appropriate agencies shall immediately revoke the
licenses and permits held by the organization for a duration of one
(1) year; and
(ii) Impose a fine fixed by ordinance, not to exceed the sum of
three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each offense and each unlaw-
fully present alien aided by the organization, or any director,
officer, or agent thereof.
(b) For a subsequent violation by an organization, or any director, of-
ficer, or agent thereof, the court shall direct the applicable state,
county, or municipal governing body to permanently revoke all business
licenses and permits, if such exist, held by the organization through-
out the state. Upon receipt of the order, and notwithstanding any other


law, the appropriate agencies shall immediately revoke the licenses and
permits held by the organization.
(5) Any conveyance, including any vessel, vehicle, or aircraft, that
has been or is being used in the commission of a violation of section 18-9202,
Idaho Code, and the gross proceeds received by any individual or organiza-
tion using such conveyance to commit such a violation shall be subject to
civil forfeiture pursuant to applicable state law.
18-9204. EXCEPTIONS. (1) A law enforcement agency and its officers,
employees, and staff, and any persons or organizations hired by a law en-
forcement agency, may securely transport an alien who is unlawfully present
in the United States to any federal, state, or local detention or holding fa-
cility or to any other location required to detain such alien or to facili-
tate transfer of the alien into federal custody.
(2) Any person acting in his official capacity as a first responder may
shelter, move, or transport an alien unlawfully present in the United States
pursuant to state law when required to provide emergency services.
18-9205. ENFORCEMENT. (1) In the enforcement of this chapter, an
alien's immigration status shall be determined by verification of the
alien's immigration status with the federal government pursuant to 8 U.S.C.
1373(c).
(2) Any record that relates to the immigration status of a person is
admissible in any court of this state without further foundation or testi-
mony from a custodian of records if the record is obtained from the federal
government agency that is responsible for maintaining the record. A veri-
fication of an alien's immigration status received from the federal govern-
ment pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1373(c) shall constitute proof of that alien's sta-
tus. A court of this state shall consider only the federal government's ver-
ification in determining whether an alien is lawfully present in the United
States.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.